District of Columbia statutes.
38-1978

Repealed

Regulation of vacation and leave periods of certain employees.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 529, ch. 569, title V, § 15
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1012, Pub. L. 85-838, § 1
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1235, Pub. L. 87-881, title I, § 101(13)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1011, Pub. L. 92-518, title I, § 103(8)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1144.
1973 Ed., § 31-1544.